Utah statutes.
53-10-407.   DNA Specimen Restricted Account.
(1)  There is created the DNA Specimen Restricted Account, which is referred
to in this section as "the account."
(2)  The sources of monies for the account are:
(a)  DNA collection fees paid under Section 53-10-404;
(b)  any appropriations made to the account by the Legislature; and
(c)  all federal monies provided to the state for the purpose of funding the
collection or analysis of DNA specimens collected under Section 53-10-403.
(3)  The account shall earn interest, and this interest shall be deposited in
the account.
(4)  The Legislature may appropriate monies from the account solely for the
following purposes:
(a)  to the Department of Corrections for the costs of:
(i)  collecting DNA specimens as required under Section 53-10-403; and
(ii)  DNA testing which cannot be performed by the Utah State Crime Lab, as
provided in Subsection 78B-9-301(8);
(b)  to the juvenile court for the costs of collecting DNA specimens as
required under Sections 53-10-403 and 78A-6-117;
(c)  to the Division of Juvenile Justice Services for the costs of collecting
DNA specimens as required under Sections 53-10-403 and 62A-7-104; and
(d)  to the Department of Public Safety for the costs of storing and analyzing
DNA specimens in accordance with the requirements of this part.
(5)  Appropriations from the account to the Department of Corrections, the
juvenile court, the Division of Juvenile Justice Services, and to the
Department of Public Safety are nonlapsing.
